Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB225.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 198B.030 is amended to read as follows:
(1) There is hereby created the Kentucky Department of Housing, Buildings and
Construction within the Public Protection Cabinet. The Governor shall appoint a
commissioner to head the department. The commissioner shall receive for his or her
services such compensation as the Governor shall determine.
(2) The commissioner may employ sufficient staff to carry out the functions of the
commissioner's office. Neither the commissioner nor any member of his or her staff
shall be employed, either directly or indirectly, in any aspect of the building
industry as regulated by this chapter while employed by the Department of
Housing, Buildings and Construction.
(3) The department shall perform all budgeting, procurement, and other administrative
activities necessary for the statewide regulation and enforcement of building,
construction, and inspection standards and codes. The department or commissioner
shall submit any proposed administrative regulation to the committee and shall not
promulgate the administrative regulation without giving the committee the
opportunity to produce written comments, as required by subsection (8) of this
section. If the committee chooses to produce written comments, the comments shall
be attached to any public submission of the administrative regulation, including any
filing under KRS Chapter 13A.
(4) The department may enter into contracts or agreements with the federal
government, its subdivisions and instrumentalities, other agencies of state
government or with its subdivisions and instrumentalities, or with private profit or
nonprofit organizations in order to effect the purposes of this chapter.
(5) The commissioner shall cooperate with the agencies of the United States and with
the governing bodies and housing authorities of counties, cities, and with not for
Page 1 of 4
XXXX 2/20/2026 1:11 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2204
profit organizations and area development districts in relation to matters set forth in
this chapter, and in any reasonable manner that may be necessary for the state to
qualify for, and to receive grants or aid from these agencies. The commissioner
shall have the power to comply with each condition and execute any agreement that
may be necessary, convenient, or desirable.
(6) Nothing in this chapter shall preclude any other agency, board, or officer of the
state from being designated as the directing or allocating agency, board, or officer
for the distribution of federal grants and aid, or the performance of other duties to
the extent necessary to qualify for and to receive grants and aid for programs under
the administration of the department.
(7) The commissioner is authorized to receive, for and on behalf of the state and the
department from the United States and agencies thereof, and from any and all other
sources, grants and aid and gifts made for the purpose of providing, or to assist in
providing, any of the programs authorized by this chapter, including expenses of
administration. All funds received under this subsection shall be paid into the state
treasury and credited to a trust and agency fund to be used by the department in
carrying out the provisions of this chapter. No part of this fund shall revert to the
general fund of the Commonwealth.
(8) (a) If the department has proposed a new or amended administrative regulation
that directly and clearly relates to the work of a profession, class of workers,
or industry that is under the authority of the committee, the department shall
not promulgate the proposed administrative regulation without first receiving
comments from the committee, subject to the restrictions of paragraph (b) of
this subsection.
(b) 1. The committee shall be granted a maximum of thirty (30) days to submit
its comments on the proposed regulatory change. This subparagraph
does not apply to an administrative regulation that is a new emergency
Page 2 of 4
XXXX 2/20/2026 1:11 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2204
administrative regulation.
2. The time limits in this paragraph shall begin from the day the
department submits the regulatory change and sets a date for a proposed
hearing for the comments of the committee. If the committee is already
scheduled to meet at a time that will give it an adequate opportunity to
review the administrative regulation and respond, the hearing may be
held at that meeting.
3. If the committee is not scheduled to meet or meets only at the call of the
department, the department shall arrange for the committee to meet at a
time that will allow the committee an adequate opportunity to review
and comment on the regulation within the time limit. If the committee
fails to comment within the time limit, the department may proceed with
the administrative changes at its discretion.
(c) To the extent that any other statute relating to the department's authority to
promulgate administrative regulations conflicts with this section, this section
shall take precedence.
(d) The department may issue advisory opinions and declaratory rulings related to
KRS Chapters 198B, 227, 227A, 236, and 318 and the administrative
regulations promulgated under those chapters.
(9) (a) If the department has proposed a new or amended administrative
regulation, it shall determine how the regulation, if adopted, would affect
residential construction by conducting:
1. A cost-benefit analysis, which shall include estimates of any potential:
a. Compliance costs that would be incurred by residential builders;
and
b. Benefits to the public including improvements to quality of life
and safety; and
Page 3 of 4
XXXX 2/20/2026 1:11 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2204
2. An analysis estimating any potential increase or decrease in the
amount of residential construction in the Commonwealth.
(b) The analyses required under paragraph (a) of this subsection shall be:
1. Completed prior to and included with the submission of the
administrative regulation to the committee under subsection (8) of this
section; and
2. Included as an attachment to the administrative regulation when it is
filed with the Legislative Research Commission in accordance with
KRS Chapter 13A.
Section 2. On or after the effective date of this Act, and prior to January 1,
2029, the Department of Housing, Buildings and Construction shall not promulgate any
administrative regulation to alter or amend a state code under its purview if that
administrative regulation would result in any increase in costs related to the construction
of residential housing, unless a specific change in regulation is explicitly required by state
or federal law.
Page 4 of 4
XXXX 2/20/2026 1:11 PM Jacketed